District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1974

Promotions — Higher-paid salary classes.

Repealed.

Aug. 5, 1955, 69 Stat. 528, ch. 569, title IV, § 11
Oct. 24, 1962, 76 Stat. 1234, Pub. L. 87-881, title I, § 101(11)
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78,§ 11, 29 DCR 49
1981 Ed., § 31-1136.
1973 Ed., § 31-1536.